Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 65
CARE AND TREATMENT OF PERSONS
WITH MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS

Editor's note:

This article 65 was added with relocations in 2010. It was amended with relocations in 2022, resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article 65 prior to 2022, consult the 2021 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning home- and community-based services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, see part 4 of article 6 of title 25.5; for liability of mental health care providers, see § 13-21-117.

Law reviews:

For article, "Expanded Medical Screening for Public Sector Psychiatric Patients", see 13

C

olo. Law. 1651 (1984); for article "Medina: Incompetence and the Right to Refuse Medication", see 14

C

olo. Law. 1998 (1985); for article, "A Critique of the Model State Law on Civil Commitment of the Mentally Ill", see 14 Colo. Law. 1206 (1985); for article, "Colorado Guardianship and Conservatorship Law: A Status Report", see 16 Colo. Law. 421 (1987); for article, "The Continuing Crisis in Mental Health Care", see 18 Colo. Law. 1533 (1989); for article, "When Worlds Collide: Mentally Ill Criminal Defendants--Part II", see 29 Colo. Law. 101 (July 2000); for article, "Guidance for Attorneys When Children's Mental Health Concerns are Implicated", see 31 Colo. Law. 33 (Oct. 2002).

Section

27-65-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the purposes of this article 65 are:

To secure for each person with a mental health disorder such care and treatment suited to the person's needs and to ensure that the care and treatment are skillfully and humanely administered with full respect for the person's dignity and personal integrity;

To deprive a person of the person's liberty for purposes of care or treatment only when less restrictive alternatives are unavailable and only when the person's safety or the safety of others is endangered;

To provide the fullest possible measure of privacy, dignity, and other rights to persons undergoing care and treatment for a mental health disorder;

To encourage the use of voluntary, rather than coercive, measures to provide care and treatment for mental health disorders and to provide the care and treatment in the least restrictive setting;

To provide appropriate information to family members concerning the location and fact of admission of a person with a mental health disorder to inpatient or residential care and treatment;

To encourage the appropriate participation of family members in the care and treatment of a person with a mental health disorder and, when appropriate, to provide information to family members in order to facilitate that participation; and

To facilitate the recovery and resiliency of each person who receives care and treatment pursuant to this article 65.

To carry out these purposes, the provisions of this article 65 must be liberally construed.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3170, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 65, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Acute treatment unit" means a facility or a distinct part of a facility for short-term psychiatric care, which may include treatment for substance use disorders, that provides a total, twenty-four-hour, therapeutically planned and professionally staffed environment for persons who do not require inpatient hospitalization but need more intense and individual services than are available on an outpatient basis, such as crisis management and stabilization services.

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-60-203.

"Behavioral health crisis" means a significant disruption in a person's mental or emotional stability or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate assessment and treatment to prevent a serious deterioration in the person's mental or physical health.

"Behavioral health crisis response team" means a mobile team that responds to people in the community who are in a behavioral health crisis and includes at least one licensed or bachelor-degree-level behavioral health worker. A "behavioral health crisis response team" includes, but is not limited to, a co-responder model, mobile crisis response unit, or a community response team.

"Behavioral health entity" has the same meaning as set forth in section 27-50-101.

"Certified peace officer" means any certified peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-102.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration established in section 27-60-203.

"Court" means any district court of the state of Colorado and the probate court in the city and county of Denver.

"Court-ordered evaluation" means an evaluation ordered by a court pursuant to section 27-65-106.

"Danger to the person's self or others" means:

A person poses a substantial risk of physical harm to the person's self as manifested by evidence of recent threats of or attempts at suicide or serious bodily harm to the person's self; or

A person poses a substantial risk of physical harm to another person or persons, as manifested by evidence of recent homicidal or other violent behavior by the person in question, or by evidence that others are placed in reasonable fear of violent behavior and serious physical harm to them, as evidenced by a recent overt act, attempt, or threat to do serious physical harm by the person in question.

"Department" means the department of human services.

"Emergency medical services facility" means a general hospital with an emergency department or a freestanding emergency department, as defined in section 25-1.5-114 (5). An emergency medical services facility is not required to be, but may elect to become, a facility designated or approved by the commissioner.

"Emergency medical services provider" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25-3.5-103 (8).

Repealed.

"Facility" means a public hospital or a licensed private hospital, behavioral health entity, institution, or residential child care facility that provides treatment for persons with mental health disorders.

"Family member" means a spouse, partner in a civil union, as defined in section 14-15-103 (5), parent, adult child, or adult sibling of a person with a mental health disorder.

"Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a mental health disorder, is incapable of making informed decisions about or providing for the person's essential needs without significant supervision and assistance from other people. As a result of being incapable of making these informed decisions, a person who is gravely disabled is at risk of substantial bodily harm, dangerous worsening of any concomitant serious physical illness, significant psychiatric deterioration, or mismanagement of the person's essential needs that could result in substantial bodily harm. A person of any age may be "gravely disabled", but the term does not include a person whose decision-making capabilities are limited solely by the person's developmental disability.

"Hospitalization" means twenty-four-hour out-of-home placement for treatment in a facility for a person with a mental health disorder.

"Independent professional person" means a professional person who evaluates a minor's condition as an independent decision-maker and whose recommendations are based on the standard of what is in the best interest of the minor. The professional person may be associated with the admitting facility if the professional person is free to independently evaluate the minor's condition and need for treatment and has the authority to refuse admission to any minor who does not satisfy the statutory standards specified in section 27-65-104 (2).

"Intervening professional" means a person who is one of the following:

A professional person;

A physician assistant licensed pursuant to section 12-240-113;

An advanced practice registered nurse, as defined in section 12-255-104 (1);

A registered professional nurse, as defined in section 12-255-104 (11), who has specific mental health training as identified by the BHA;

A clinical social worker licensed pursuant to part 4 of article 245 of title 12;

A marriage and family therapist licensed pursuant to part 5 of article 245 of title 12;

A professional counselor licensed pursuant to part 6 of article 245 of title 12; or

An addiction counselor licensed pursuant to part 8 of article 245 of title 12.

"Lay person" means a person identified by another person who is detained on an involuntary emergency mental health hold pursuant to section 27-65-106, certified for short-term treatment pursuant to section 27-65-109, or certified for long-term care and treatment pursuant to section 27-65-110 who is authorized to participate in activities related to the person's involuntary emergency mental health hold, short-term treatment, or long-term treatment, including court appearances, discharge planning, and grievances. The person may rescind the lay person's authorization at any time.

"Mental health disorder" includes one or more substantial disorders of the cognitive, volitional, or emotional processes that grossly impairs judgment or capacity to recognize reality or to control behavior. An intellectual or developmental disability is insufficient to either justify or exclude a finding of a mental health disorder pursuant to the provisions of this article 65.

"Minor" means a person under eighteen years of age; except that the term does not include a person who is fifteen years of age or older who is living separately and apart from the person's parent or legal guardian and is managing the person's own financial affairs, regardless of the person's source of income, or who is married and living separately and apart from the person's parent or legal guardian.

"Patient representative" means a person designated by a mental health facility to process patient complaints or grievances or to represent patients who are minors pursuant to section 27-65-104 (4).

"Petitioner" means any person who files any petition in any proceeding in the interest of any person who allegedly has a mental health disorder or is allegedly gravely disabled.

"Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine in this state.

"Professional person" means a person licensed to practice medicine in this state, a psychologist licensed to practice in this state, or a person licensed and in good standing to practice medicine in another state or a psychologist licensed to practice and in good standing in another state who is providing medical or clinical services at a treatment facility in this state that is operated by the armed forces of the United States, the United States public health service, or the United States department of veterans affairs.

"Residential child care facility" has the same meaning as set forth in section 26-6-903 (29). A residential child care facility may be eligible for designation by the commissioner pursuant to this article 65.

"Respondent" means either a person alleged in a petition filed pursuant to this article 65 to have a mental health disorder or be gravely disabled or a person certified pursuant to the provisions of this article 65.

"Screening" means a review of all petitions, to consist of an interview with the petitioner and, whenever possible, the respondent; an assessment of the problem; an explanation of the petition to the respondent; and a determination of whether the respondent needs and, if so, will accept on a voluntary basis, a comprehensive evaluation, treatment, referral, and other appropriate services, either on an inpatient or an outpatient basis.

"Secure transportation provider" means a provider licensed pursuant to section 25-3.5-310 to provide public or private secure transportation services.

Source:

L. 2022:

(1.5)(a) and (28) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 863, § 116, effective July 1; (2) and (7) added, (12) and (28) amended, and (14) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1537, § 114, effective July 1; entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3171, § 1, effective August 10; (14) repealed, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3240, § 56, effective August 10; (5) and (15) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1594, § 235, effective July 1, 2024.

27-65-103. Voluntary applications for mental health services.

Nothing in this article 65 in any way limits the right of any person to make a voluntary application at any time to any public or private agency or professional person for mental health services, either by direct application in person or by referral from any other public or private agency or professional person. Subject to section 15-14-316 (4), a ward, as defined in section 15-14-102 (15), may be admitted to a hospital or institutional care and treatment for a mental health disorder with the guardian's consent for as long as the ward agrees to such care and treatment. The guardian shall immediately notify in writing the court that appointed the guardian of the admission.

For the purpose of this article 65, the treatment by prayer in the practice of the religion of any church that teaches reliance on spiritual means alone for healing is considered a form of treatment.

The medical and legal status of all voluntary patients receiving treatment for mental health disorders in inpatient or custodial facilities must be reviewed at least once every six months.

Voluntary patients are afforded all the rights and privileges customarily granted by hospitals to their patients.

If at any time during an emergency mental health hold of a person who is confined involuntarily the facility staff requests the person to sign in voluntarily and the person elects to do so, the following advisement shall be given orally and in writing and an appropriate notation shall be made in the person's medical record by the professional person or the professional person's designated agent:

This subsection (5) does not apply to a person on an emergency mental health hold in an emergency medical services facility.

NOTICE

The decision to sign in voluntarily should be made by you alone and should be free from any force or pressure implied or otherwise. If you do not feel that you are able to make a truly voluntary decision, you may continue to be held at the hospital involuntarily. As an involuntary patient, you will have the right to protest your confinement and request a hearing before a judge.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3175, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-65-103 as it existed prior to 2022.

27-65-104. Voluntary applications for mental health services - treatment of minors - definition.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a minor who is fifteen years of age or older, whether with or without the consent of a parent or legal guardian, may consent to receive mental health services to be rendered by a facility, a professional person, or mental health professional licensed pursuant to part 3, 4, 5, 6, or 8 of article 245 of title 12 in any practice setting. Such consent is not subject to disaffirmance because of minority. The professional person or licensed mental health professional rendering mental health services to a minor may, with or without the consent of the minor, advise the minor's parent or legal guardian of the services given or needed.

A minor who is fifteen years of age or older or a minor's parent or legal guardian, on the minor's behalf, may make a voluntary application for hospitalization. An application for hospitalization on behalf of a minor who is under fifteen years of age and who is a ward of the department must not be made unless a guardian ad litem has been appointed for the minor or a petition for the same has been filed with the court by the agency having custody of the minor; except that such an application for hospitalization may be made under emergency circumstances requiring immediate hospitalization, in which case the agency shall file a petition for appointment of a guardian ad litem within seventy-two hours after application for admission is made, and the court shall immediately appoint a guardian ad litem. Procedures for hospitalization of a minor may proceed pursuant to this section once a petition for appointment of a guardian ad litem has been filed, if necessary. Whenever an application for hospitalization is made, an independent professional person shall interview the minor and conduct a careful investigation into the minor's background, using all available sources, including, but not limited to, the minor's parents or legal guardian, the minor's school, and any other social service agencies. Prior to admitting a minor for hospitalization, the independent professional person shall make the following findings:

That the minor has a mental health disorder and is in need of hospitalization;

That a less restrictive treatment alternative is inappropriate or unavailable; and

That hospitalization is likely to be beneficial.

An interview and investigation by an independent professional person is not required for a minor who is fifteen years of age or older and who, upon the recommendation of the minor's treating professional person, seeks voluntary hospitalization with the consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian. In order to assure that the minor's consent to such hospitalization is voluntary, the minor shall be advised, at or before the time of admission, of the minor's right to refuse to sign the admission consent form and the minor's right to revoke the minor's consent at a later date. If a minor admitted pursuant to this subsection (3) subsequently revokes the minor's consent after admission, a review of the minor's need for hospitalization pursuant to subsection (4) of this section must be initiated immediately.

The need for continuing hospitalization of all voluntary minor patients must be formally reviewed at least every two months. Review pursuant to this subsection (4) must fulfill the requirement specified in section 19-1-115 (8) when the minor is fifteen years of age or older and consenting to hospitalization.

The review must be conducted by an independent professional person who is not a member of the minor's treating team; or, if the minor, the minor's physician, and the minor's parent or legal guardian do not object to the need for continued hospitalization, the review required pursuant to this subsection (4) may be conducted internally by the hospital staff.

The independent professional person shall determine whether the minor continues to meet the criteria specified in subsection (2) of this section and whether continued hospitalization is appropriate and shall, at a minimum, conduct an investigation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Ten days prior to the review, the patient representative at the mental health facility shall notify the minor of the date of the review and shall assist the minor in articulating to the independent professional person the minor's wishes concerning continued hospitalization.

Nothing in this section limits a minor's right to seek release from the facility pursuant to any other provision of law.

Every six months the review required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall be conducted by an independent professional person who is not a member of the minor's treating team and who has not previously reviewed the minor pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

When a minor does not consent to or objects to continued hospitalization, the need for such continued hospitalization must, within ten days, be reviewed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section by an independent professional person who is not a member of the minor's treating team and who has not previously reviewed the minor pursuant to this subsection (6). The minor shall be informed of the results of the review within three days after the review's completion. If the conclusion reached by the professional person is that the minor no longer meets the standards for hospitalization specified in subsection (2) of this section, the minor must be discharged.

If, twenty-four hours after being informed of the results of the review specified in subsection (6)(a) of this section, a minor continues to affirm the objection to hospitalization, the director of the facility or the director's duly appointed representative shall advise the minor that the minor has the right to retain and consult with an attorney at any time and that the director or the director's duly appointed representative shall file, within three days after the request of the minor, a statement requesting an attorney for the minor or, if the minor is under fifteen years of age, a guardian ad litem. The minor; the minor's attorney, if any; and the minor's parent, legal guardian, or guardian ad litem, if any, shall be given written notice that a hearing upon the recommendation for continued hospitalization may be had before the court or a jury upon written request directed to the court pursuant to subsection (6)(d) of this section.

Whenever the statement requesting an attorney is filed with the court, the court shall ascertain whether the minor has retained counsel, and, if the minor has not, the court shall, within three days, appoint an attorney to represent the minor, or if the minor is under fifteen years of age, a guardian ad litem. Upon receipt of a petition filed by the guardian ad litem, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the minor under fifteen years of age.

The minor or the minor's attorney or guardian ad litem may, at any time after the minor has continued to affirm the minor's objection to hospitalization pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, file a written request that the recommendation for continued hospitalization be reviewed by the court or that the treatment be on an outpatient basis. If review is requested, the court shall hear the matter within ten days after the request, and the court shall give notice of the time and place of the hearing to the minor; the minor's attorney, if any; the minor's parents or legal guardian; the minor's guardian ad litem, if any; the independent professional person; and the minor's treating team. The hearing must be held in accordance with section 27-65-113; except that the court or jury shall determine that the minor is in need of care and treatment if the court or jury makes the following findings:

That the minor has a mental health disorder and is in need of hospitalization;

That a less restrictive treatment alternative is inappropriate or unavailable; and

That hospitalization is likely to be beneficial.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the court may enter an order confirming the recommendation for continued hospitalization, discharge the minor, or enter any other appropriate order.

For purposes of this subsection (6), "objects to hospitalization" means that a minor, with the necessary assistance of hospital staff, has written the minor's objections to continued hospitalization and has been given an opportunity to affirm or disaffirm such objections forty-eight hours after the objections are first written.

A minor may not again object to hospitalization pursuant to this subsection (6) until ninety days after conclusion of proceedings pursuant to this subsection (6).

In addition to the rights specified in section 27-65-119 for persons receiving evaluation, care, or treatment, a written notice specifying the rights of minor children under this section must be given to each minor upon admission to hospitalization.

A minor who no longer meets the standards for hospitalization specified in subsection (2) of this section must be discharged.

Source:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3176, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to several former provisions of § 27-65-103 as they existed prior to 2022. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

27-65-105. Rights of respondents.

Unless specifically stated in an order by the court, a respondent does not forfeit any legal right or suffer legal disability by reason of the provisions of this article 65.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3179, § 1, effective August 10; (6) repealed, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3240, § 56, effective August 10.

27-65-106. Emergency mental health hold - screening - court-ordered evaluation - discharge instructions - respondent's rights - report.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2023.]

Emergency procedure may be invoked under one of the following conditions:

When any person appears to have a mental health disorder and, as a result of such mental health disorder, appears to be an imminent danger to others or to the person's self or appears to be gravely disabled, then an intervening professional or certified peace officer, upon probable cause and with such assistance as may be required, may take the person into custody, or cause the person to be taken into custody, and placed in a facility designated or approved by the commissioner for a seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation. If such a facility is not available, the person may be taken to an emergency medical services facility.

Upon an affidavit sworn to or affirmed before a judge that relates sufficient facts to establish that a person appears to have a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, appears to be an imminent danger to others or to the person's self or appears to be gravely disabled, the court may order the person described in the affidavit to be taken into custody and placed in a facility designated or approved by the commissioner for a seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation. Whenever in this article 65 a facility is to be designated or approved by the commissioner, hospitals, if available, must be approved or designated in each county before other facilities are approved or designated. Whenever in this article 65 a facility is to be designated or approved by the commissioner as a facility for a stated purpose and the facility to be designated or approved is a private facility, the consent of the private facility to the enforcement of standards set by the commissioner is a prerequisite to the designation or approval.

Any individual may petition the court in the county in which the respondent resides or is physically present alleging that there is a person who appears to have a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, appears to be a danger to others or to the person's self or appears to be gravely disabled and requesting an evaluation of the person's condition.

When a person is taken into custody pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the person must not be detained in a jail, lockup, or other place used for the confinement of persons charged with or convicted of penal offenses.

When a person is taken into emergency custody by an intervening professional or certified peace officer pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and is presented to an emergency medical services facility or a facility that is designated or approved by the commissioner, the facility shall require an application in writing, stating the circumstances under which the person's condition was called to the attention of the intervening professional or certified peace officer and further stating sufficient facts, obtained from the intervening professional's or certified peace officer's personal observations or obtained from others whom the intervening professional or certified peace officer reasonably believes to be reliable, to establish that the person has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is an imminent danger to others or to the person's self, is gravely disabled, or is in need of immediate evaluation for treatment. The application must indicate when the person was taken into custody and who brought the person's condition to the attention of the intervening professional or certified peace officer. A copy of the application must be furnished to the person being evaluated, and the application must be retained in accordance with section 27-65-123 (4).

The petition for a court-ordered evaluation must contain the following:

The name and address of the petitioner and the petitioner's interest in the case;

The name of the person for whom evaluation is sought who is designated as the respondent, and, if known to the petitioner, the address, age, sex, marital status, and occupation of the respondent;

Allegations of fact indicating that the respondent may have a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, be a danger to others or to the respondent's self or be gravely disabled and showing reasonable grounds to warrant an evaluation;

The name and address of every person known or believed by the petitioner to be legally responsible for the care, support, and maintenance of the respondent, if available;

The name, address, and telephone number of the attorney, if any, who has most recently represented the respondent. If there is no attorney, there shall be a statement as to whether, to the best knowledge of the petitioner, the respondent meets the criteria established by the legal aid agency operating in the county or city and county for it to represent a client.

Upon receipt of a petition satisfying the requirements of subsection (4)(a) of this section, the court shall designate a facility, approved by the commissioner, an intervening professional, or a certified peace officer to provide screening of the respondent to determine whether there is probable cause to believe the allegations.

Following screening, the facility, intervening professional, or certified peace officer designated by the court shall file a report with the court. The report must include a recommendation as to whether there is probable cause to believe that the respondent has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to others or to the respondent's self or is gravely disabled and whether the respondent will voluntarily receive evaluation or treatment. The screening report submitted to the court pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) is confidential in accordance with section 27-65-123 and must be furnished to the respondent or the respondent's attorney or personal representative.

Whenever it appears, by petition and screening pursuant to this section, to the satisfaction of the court that probable cause exists to believe that the respondent has a mental health disorder and, as a result of the mental health disorder, is a danger to others or to the respondent's self or is gravely disabled and that efforts have been made to secure the cooperation of the respondent, who has refused or failed to accept evaluation voluntarily, the court shall issue an order for evaluation authorizing a certified peace officer or secure transportation provider to take the respondent into custody and transport the respondent to a facility designated by the commissioner for seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation. At the time of taking the respondent into custody, a copy of the petition and the order for evaluation must be given to the respondent and promptly thereafter to any one person designated by the respondent and to the person in charge of the seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation facility named in the order or the respondent's designee.

If the seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation facility admits the person, it may detain the person for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays if evaluation and treatment services are not available on those days. For the purposes of this subsection (5), evaluation and treatment services are not deemed to be available merely because a professional person is on call during weekends or holidays. If, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the evaluation, the person can be properly cared for without being detained, the person shall be provided services on a voluntary basis.

Each person admitted to a seventy-two-hour treatment and evaluation facility under the provisions of this article 65 shall receive an evaluation as soon as possible after the person is admitted and shall receive such treatment and care as the person's condition requires for the full period that the person is held. The person must be released before seventy-two hours have elapsed if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the evaluation, the person no longer requires evaluation or treatment. Persons who have been detained for seventy-two-hour evaluation and treatment shall be released, referred for further care and treatment on a voluntary basis, or certified for treatment pursuant to section 27-65-109.

Reserved.

On or before July 1, 2019, and each July 1 thereafter, each emergency medical services facility that has treated a person pursuant to this section shall provide an annual report to the BHA that includes only disaggregated and nonidentifying information concerning persons who were treated at an emergency medical services facility pursuant to this section. The report must comply with section 24-1-136 (9) and is exempt from section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I). The report must contain the following:

The names and counties of the facilities;

The total number of persons treated pursuant to this section, including a summary of demographic information;

A summary regarding the different reasons for which persons were treated pursuant to this section; and

A summary of the disposition of persons transferred to a designated facility.

Any information disaggregated and provided to the BHA pursuant to this subsection (9) is privileged and confidential. Such information must not be made available to the public except in an aggregate format that cannot be used to identify an individual facility. The information is not subject to civil subpoena and is not discoverable or admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding against an emergency medical services facility or health-care professional. The information must be used only to assess statewide behavioral health services needs and to plan for sufficient levels of statewide behavioral health services. In the collection of data to accomplish the requirements of this subsection (9), the BHA shall protect the confidentiality of patient records, in accordance with state and federal laws, and shall not disclose any public identifying or proprietary information of any hospital, hospital administrator, health-care professional, or employee of a health-care facility.

Subsection (9)(b)(I) of this section does not apply to information that is otherwise available from a source outside of the data collection activities required pursuant to subsection (9)(a) of this section.